Utah statutes.
56-2-3.   Penalties.
Every railroad corporation guilty of transporting defective cars or equipment
within the state is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.  Every offense is
punishable by a fine not less than $250, and the person or employee of the
corporation responsible for permitting the broken or defective car to go into
transit and to be transported within the state of Utah is guilty of a class A
misdemeanor.
